District of Columbia statutes.
7-1651.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“CDC” means the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(2)

“HPV” means the human papillomavirus.

July 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-10, § 2, 54 DCR 5146